Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2443.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-3223, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-3223. Original applicant; requirements; expiration; renewal examination A. In addition to the requirements applicable to all driver license applicants, an original applicant for a class A, B or C license is subject to the following requirements: 1. The applicant shall submit evidence of compliance with medical standards and requirements that the department adopts by rule. 2. The applicant must have held a driver license for at least one year either in this state, any other state or a foreign country. 3. The applicant shall take additional knowledge examinations to demonstrate understanding of the following: (a) Safety operation rules. (b) Commercial motor vehicle safety control systems. (c) Safe vehicle control. (d) The relationship of cargo to vehicle control. (e) Basic hazardous materials knowledge. (f) The objectives and proper procedures for performing vehicle safety inspections. (g) Air brake systems. (h) Legal requirements for size, weight and vehicle configurations. (i) Emergency procedures. (j) English proficiency. The english proficiency examination must include COMPONENTS of reading, speaking, WRITING and listening. 4. In addition to the other requirements of this section, an applicant for a class A driver license shall demonstrate a knowledge and understanding of: (a) Vehicle coupling and uncoupling. (b) Unique combination vehicle inspections. 5. The applicant shall take a driving test in a vehicle or vehicle combination that at least meets the minimum size requirements for the class of driver license sought. The driving test shall include a demonstration of familiarity with pretrip inspection procedures. B. A person possessing a commercial driver license on or before June 30, 2005 shall renew the license within eight years according to procedures established by the department. C. Notwithstanding section 28-3171, the holder of a class A, B or C driver license shall renew the license every eight years in a manner prescribed by the department. D. The department may administer an examination to a renewal applicant for a class A, B or C driver license. This examination on renewal shall include the following: 1. Evidence of compliance with medical standards adopted by the department. 2. Administration of knowledge tests or road tests, or both, as required of an original applicant. END_STATUTE